Louisiana, session 2026, HB433.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:2740.8(D)(1)(b), 2740.19(D)(1)(e), 2740.53(B)(1)(b),
2740.67.1(C)(1)(f), and 4720.151(G)(1)(b) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§2740.8. The downtown development district of the city of Baton Rouge; creation,
composition and powers; preparation of plans, levy of special ad valorem
taxes, and issuance of bonds and other instruments of indebtedness
* * *
D.(1) The board shall be composed of seven members, all of whom shall be
qualified voters of the parish of East Baton Rouge, and shall have their principal
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 433 ENROLLED
place of business or profession in, or own property in, the Downtown Development
District. The seven members shall be appointed as follows:
* * *
(b) One member of the board shall be appointed by the mayor-president,
with the approval of the metro council, from a list of four nominees submitted by the
Greater Baton Rouge Area Chamber of Commerce Greater Baton Rouge Economic
Partnership.
* * *
§2740.19. Baton Rouge Inner City Economic Development District; creation,
composition and powers
* * *
D.(1) The board shall be composed of fifteen members, all of whom shall be
qualified voters of the parish of East Baton Rouge. The members shall be appointed
as follows:
* * *
(e) One member shall be appointed by the president of the Baton Rouge
Chamber of Commerce Greater Baton Rouge Economic Partnership.
* * *
§2740.53. Florida Boulevard Economic Development District
* * *
B. Governance. (1) The district shall be governed by an eleven-member
board of commissioners. The members shall be appointed as follows:
* * *
(b) One member of the board shall be appointed by the mayor-president,
with the approval of the metropolitan council, from a list of four nominees submitted
by the Greater Baton Rouge Area Chamber of Commerce Greater Baton Rouge
Economic Partnership.
* * *
§2740.67.1. Plank Road Business Economic Development District
* * *
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 433 ENROLLED
C. Governance. (1) In order to provide for the orderly planning,
development, acquisition, construction, and effectuation of the services,
improvements, and facilities to be furnished by the district and to provide for the
representation in the affairs of the district of those persons and interests immediately
concerned with and affected by the purposes and development of the district, the
district shall be managed by a seven-member board of commissioners, referred to in
this Section as the "board". The board shall be comprised of members as follows:
* * *
(f) One member shall be appointed by the governing board of the Baton
Rouge Area Chamber Greater Baton Rouge Economic Partnership.
* * *
§4720.151. East Baton Rouge Redevelopment Authority
* * *
G.(1) The authority shall be governed by a board of commissioners, referred
to in this Chapter as the "board", consisting of five members appointed as follows:
* * *
(b) One member shall be appointed by the governing authority of the Baton
Rouge Area Chamber Greater Baton Rouge Economic Partnership.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 39:1482(4) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1482. Definitions
For purposes of this Chapter, the following words have the following
meanings:
* * *
(4) "Regional economic development organization" means any of the
following: the Baton Rouge Area Chamber Greater Baton Rouge Economic
Partnership, or its successor; the Central Louisiana Economic Development Alliance,
or its successor; Greater New Orleans, Inc., or its successor; the Northeast Louisiana
Economic Alliance, or its successor; the North Louisiana Economic Partnership, or
its successor; One Acadiana, or its successor; the South Louisiana Economic
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 433 ENROLLED
Council, or its successor; or the Southwest Louisiana Economic Development
Alliance, or its successor.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.